California, session 20252026, AB2620.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21080.75 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.75. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Broadband internet access project” means a project to provide mass-market retail service by wire or radio provided to customers in California that provides the capability to transmit data to, and receive data from, all or substantially all internet endpoints, including, but not limited to, a capability that is incidental to, and enable the operation of, the communication service, but excluding dial-up internet access service.(2) “Small wireless facility” means a facility that meets the definition of small wireless facilities as defined in Section 1.6002(l) of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as may be modified or amended by the Federal Communications Commission.(3) “Wireless telecommunications facility” means equipment and network components, including, but not limited to, towers, utility poles, transmitters, base stations, and emergency power systems, that are used in the provision of wireless telecommunications services.(b) This division does not apply to a project for the installation of a wireless telecommunications facility, or a broadband internet access project, that is not a small wireless facility.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1 of this act adding Section 21080.75 to the Public Resources Code addresses a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act applies to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 32602 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:32602.There is in the Natural Resources Agency the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, which is created as a state agency for the following purposes:(a)To acquire and manage public lands located within the lower Los Angeles River and San Gabriel River watersheds, the Dominguez Channel watershed, and Santa Catalina Island, and to provide for open-space, low-impact recreational and educational uses, water conservation, watershed improvement, wildlife and habitat restoration and protection, and watershed improvement within the territory.(b)To preserve the San Gabriel River and the lower Los Angeles River, the Dominguez Channel watershed, and Santa Catalina Island in a manner that is consistent with existing and adopted river and flood control projects for the protection of life and property.(c)To acquire open-space lands within the territory of the conservancy.(d)To provide for the public’s enjoyment and enhancement of recreational and educational experiences on public lands in the San Gabriel Watershed and lower Los Angeles River, the San Gabriel Mountains, the Dominguez Channel watershed, and Santa Catalina Island in a manner that is consistent with the protection of lands and resources in those watersheds.